dix/consistent-monA.dix
    <pardef n="nom__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>j</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>jn</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nomf__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>j</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>jn</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ino__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oj</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ino</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inoj</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>on</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ojn</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inon</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inojn</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="la__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mia__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>j</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>jn</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dem__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>j</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>jn</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ambaŭ__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ind__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>j</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>jn</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="quant__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>j</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>jn</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="adolto">
        <i>adolt</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ambasadoro">
        <i>ambasador</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="apotekisto">
        <i>apotekist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="astronomo">
        <i>astronom</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="bandito">
        <i>bandit</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="bulgaro">
        <i>bulgar</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ĉiliano">
        <i>ĉilian</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="dio">
        <i>di</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="entrudulo">
        <i>entrudul</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="fantomo">
        <i>fantom</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="funelo">
        <i>funel</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="helpanto">
        <i>helpant</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="indiĝeno">
        <i>indiĝen</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="irakano">
        <i>irakan</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ĵurnalisto">
        <i>ĵurnalist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kato">
        <i>kat</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kolombiano">
        <i>kolombian</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kontraŭulo">
        <i>kontraŭul</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="laboristo">
        <i>laborist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="markizo">
        <i>markiz</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="metilernanto">
        <i>metilernant</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="nevo">
        <i>nev</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="parenco">
        <i>parenc</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="pedagogo">
        <i>pedagog</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="poeto">
        <i>poet</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="princo">
        <i>princ</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="reĝo">
        <i>reĝ</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="sklavo">
        <i>sklav</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="suvereno">
        <i>suveren</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="tubisto">
        <i>tubist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="venezuelano">
        <i>venezuelan</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="artisto">
        <i>artist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="aŭtonomo">
        <i>aŭtonom</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="bulgaro">
        <i>bulgar</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="juvelisto">
        <i>juvelist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="bestkuracisto">
        <i>bestkuracist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="flegisto">
        <i>flegist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="parolanto">
        <i>parolant</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="iniciatinto">
        <i>iniciatint</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="vicprezidanto">
        <i>vicprezidant</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="piloto">
        <i>pilot</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="elimini">
        <i>elimini</i> 
        <par n="nom__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="konsilanto">
        <i>konsilant</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="direktisto">
        <i>direktist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ministo">
        <i>minist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="produktanto">
        <i>produktant</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="najbaro">
        <i>najbar</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="la">
        <i>la</i> 
        <par n="la__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="mia">
        <i>mia</i> 
        <par n="mia__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="via">
        <i>via</i> 
        <par n="mia__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="lia">
        <i>lia</i> 
        <par n="mia__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ŝia">
        <i>ŝia</i> 
        <par n="mia__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ĝia">
        <i>ĝia</i> 
        <par n="mia__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="nia">
        <i>nia</i> 
        <par n="mia__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ilia">
        <i>ilia</i> 
        <par n="mia__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="certa">
        <i>certa</i> 
        <par n="ind__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ambaŭ">
        <i>ambaŭ</i> 
        <par n="ambaŭ__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="tia">
        <i>tia</i> 
        <par n="ind__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="tiu">
        <i>tiu</i> 
        <par n="dem__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="alia">
        <i>alia</i> 
        <par n="ind__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="diversa">
        <i>diversa</i> 
        <par n="ind__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ajna">
        <i>ajna</i> 
        <par n="ind__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="iu">
        <i>iu</i> 
        <par n="quant__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ĉiu">
        <i>ĉiu</i> 
        <par n="ind__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ĉiu">
        <i>ĉiu</i> 
        <par n="quant__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="neniu">
        <i>neniu</i> 
        <par n="ind__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="multa">
        <i>multa</i> 
        <par n="quant__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="malmulta">
        <i>malmulta</i> 
        <par n="quant__det" /> 
    </e>
